New York, session 2025-2026, A522.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (e) of section 103 of the public officers law, 2 as amended by chapter 481 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 (e) Agency records available to the public pursuant to article six of 5 this chapter, as well as any proposed resolution, law, rule, regulation, 6 policy or any amendment thereto, that is scheduled to be the subject of 7 discussion by a public body during an open meeting shall be made avail- 8 able, upon request therefor, [to the extent practicable at least twen- 9 ty-four hours] prior to the meeting during which the records will be 10 discussed. Copies of such records may be made available for a reasonable 11 fee, determined in the same manner as provided therefor in article six 12 of this chapter. If the agency in which a public body functions main- 13 tains a regularly and routinely updated website and utilizes a high 14 speed internet connection, such records shall be posted on the website 15 to the extent practicable at least twenty-four hours prior to the meet- 16 ing. An agency may, but shall not be required to, expend additional 17 moneys to implement the provisions of this subdivision. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02106-01-5